Mississippi, session 2026, SB2237.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  There is established within the State Department of Education the Student School Stewardship Pilot Program to implement in Mississippi public K-12 schools  structured, student-led cleaning activities designed to foster responsibility, respect for shared spaces, teamwork and community engagement modeled on the Japanese educational tradition known as "ōsōji."  The program shall operate for no less than two (2) academic years beginning in the 2026-2027 academic year, subject to extension or expansion by the Legislature. (2)  The program shall be implemented in no more than ten (10) school districts in the state, representing elementary schools, middle schools, and high schools.  Schools shall be selected for participation in the program according to a voluntary application process.  Such applications should be considered according to criteria designed by the Mississippi Department of Education for the purpose of ensuring that participating school districts are geographically and demographically diverse. (3)  Upon selection for participation in the program, school districts shall create a list of nonhazardous, age-appropriate activities for the program to be approved by the department. Such activities may include, but are not limited to, sweeping floors, wiping desks, organizing materials, and tidying common areas. (4)  Upon approval of such list by the department, participating school districts shall implement daily or regular student-led cleaning sessions of approximately ten (10) to twenty (20) minutes.  Students shall rotate tasks in teams, under the supervision of school staff.  At no time shall students participate in program activities without appropriate adult supervision.  A local school district shall obtain written informed consent from a student's parent or legal guardian prior to the student participating in any activities under the program. (5)  All materials used for cleaning shall be provided by the school, and students shall receive training on appropriate cleaning practices.  No student shall be required to handle hazardous materials or perform tasks unsuitable for their age or physical ability.  Each task assigned shall be chosen with the age and ability of the students in mind.  Accommodations shall be made for students with disabilities or health concerns. (6)  As a component of program implementation, school districts may incorporate lessons on civic responsibility, environmental stewardship and community service in conjunction with program activities.  Teachers may facilitate periodic reflections or discussions to support learning outcomes in furtherance of these principles. (7)  The Mississippi Department of Education shall collect data from participating schools, including, but not limited to, student and teacher feedback, school climate indicators, and observational reports.  The department may promulgate rules and regulations concerning the collection of data from participating school districts. (8)  No later than December 31, 2028, the department shall submit a report to the Legislature summarizing findings, lessons learned, and recommendations for continuation, expansion or termination of the program. (9)  Subject to appropriation, funds shall be allocated by the Department of Education to cover cleaning materials, training, evaluation and administrative costs.  Schools may also partner with local businesses or civic organizations for in-kind support. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.